Hawaii, session 2026, HB2573.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  There is established within the department of agriculture and biosecurity, in collaboration with the university of Hawaii's Leeward community college, department of human resources development, and department of law enforcement, a five-year agriculture and biosecurity workforce development pilot program to equip interested students with the necessary entry-level knowledge, skill set, expertise, and advancement potential in the field of agriculture and biosecurity. (b) The agriculture and biosecurity workforce development pilot program shall: (1)  Develop a curriculum of a broad spectrum of topics relevant to agriculture and biosecurity; (2)  Provide practical, hands-on training and work opportunities that allow students to gain real-world experience in the agriculture and biosecurity sector; provided that the training and provision of work opportunities shall not interfere with the existing operations of the department of agriculture and biosecurity; and (3)  Encourage additional training and credential attainment by offering increased compensation, as determined by the department of human resources development, to participants who transition into biosecurity employment. (c) The department of agriculture and biosecurity, in collaboration with the university of Hawaii's Leeward community college, department of human resources development, and department of law enforcement, shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations on the agriculture and biosecurity workforce development pilot program, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2031. (d) The agriculture and biosecurity workforce development pilot program shall cease to exist on June 30, 2031. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.